Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0136.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 13501. (1) As used in this part: (a) General license means a license, effective pursuant to rules promulgated by the department without the filing of an application, to transfer, acquire, own, possess, or use quantities of, or devices or equipment utilizing, radioactive material. (b) Ionizing radiation means gamma rays and x-rays, alpha particles, beta particles, high speed electrons, neutrons, protons, high speed ions, and other high speed nuclear particles. (c) Mammography means any of the following: (i) Radiography of the breast for the purpose of enabling a physician to determine the presence, size, location, and extent of cancerous or potentially cancerous tissue in the breast. (ii) Interventional mammography. (d) Person means a person as that term is defined in section 1106 or a governmental entity. (e) Radiation machine means a machine, other than those exempted by department rule, that emits ionizing radiation. (f) Radioactive material means a solid, liquid, or gas material that emits ionizing radiation spontaneously. (g) Radiography means the making of a film or other record of an internal structure of the body by passing x-rays or gamma rays through the body to act on film or other image receptor. (h) Registration means registration of a source of ionizing radiation in writing with the department. (i) Source of ionizing radiation means a device or material that emits ionizing radiation. (j) Specific license means a license issued to use, manufacture, produce, transfer, receive, acquire, own, or possess quantities of, or devices or equipment utilizing, radioactive material. (2) In addition, article 1 contains general definitions and principles of construction applicable to all articles in this code. Sec. 13521. (1) The department shall promulgate rules providing for general licenses or specific licenses or registration, or exemption from licensing or registration, for radioactive materials and other sources of ionizing radiation. The rules must provide for the amendment, suspension, or revocation of licenses. In connection with those rules, subject to section 13527, the department may promulgate rules to establish requirements for record keeping, permissible levels of exposure, notification and reports of accidents, protective measures, technical qualifications of personnel, handling, transportation, storage, waste disposal, posting and labeling of hazardous sources and areas, surveys, and monitoring. (2) The rules must not limit the intentional exposure of patients to radiation for the purpose of lawful therapy or research conducted by licensed health professionals. Sec. 13522. (1) In promulgating rules under this part, the department shall avoid requiring dual licensing, insofar as practical. Rules promulgated by the department may provide for the recognition of other state or federal licenses as the department considers desirable, subject to registration requirements prescribed by the department. A person that, on the effective date of an agreement under 1965 PA 54, MCL 3.801 to 3.802, possesses a license issued by the federal government for a source of ionizing radiation of the type for which this state assumes regulatory responsibility under the agreement, is considered to possess an identical license issued under this part, which license expires either 90 days after receipt of a written notice of termination from the department or on the date of expiration stated in the federal license, whichever occurs first. (2) The department may promulgate rules to establish a schedule of fees to be paid by applicants for licenses for radioactive materials and devices and equipment utilizing the radioactive materials. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the department may promulgate rules to establish a schedule of fees to be paid by an applicant for a license for other sources of ionizing radiation and the renewal of the license, and by a person possessing sources of ionizing radiation that are subject to registration. The registration or registration renewal fee for a radiation machine registered under this part is $108.45 for the first veterinary or dental x-ray or electron tube and $60.17 for each additional veterinary or dental x-ray or electron tube annually, or $180.83 annually per nonveterinary or nondental x-ray or electron tube. The department shall not assess a fee for the amendment of a radiation machine registration certificate. In addition, the department shall assess a fee of $241.26 for each follow-up inspection due to noncompliance during the same year. The department may accept a written certification from the licensee or registrant that the items of noncompliance have been corrected instead of performing a follow-up inspection. If the department does not inspect a source of ionizing radiation for a period of 5 consecutive years, the licensee or registrant of the source of ionizing radiation does not have to pay further license or registration fees as to that source of ionizing radiation until the first license or registration renewal date following the time an inspection of the source of ionizing radiation is made. (4) A fee collected under this part must be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the general fund of this state. (5) The department shall assess the following nonrefundable fees in connection with mammography inspection: (a) Inspection, per radiation machine.............................................................................. $ 241.26 (b) Follow-up inspection due to noncompliance, per radiation machine........................ $ 241.26 (6) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), the department shall not waive a fee required under this section. (7) The department shall adjust on an annual basis the fees prescribed by subsections (3) and (5) by an amount determined by the state treasurer to reflect the cumulative annual percentage change in the Detroit Consumer Price Index, not to exceed 5%. As used in this subsection, Detroit Consumer Price Index means the most comprehensive index of consumer prices available for the Detroit-Warren-Dearborn area from the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. Sec. 13523. (1) A person shall not use a radiation machine to perform mammography unless the radiation machine is registered with the department under department rules for registration of radiation machines and the radiation machine, the personnel operating the radiation machine, and the facility in which the radiation machine is used meet requirements established by the department by rule for radiation machines. (2) To ensure compliance with the requirements described in this section, the department shall inspect a radiation machine at intervals that the department considers necessary or appropriate, including initiating a follow-up inspection of a radiation machine due to noncompliance. (3) In addition to the penalties provided in section 13535 and the fee required under section 13522(5) for a follow-up inspection due to noncompliance, if a person violates subsection (1), the department may impose an administrative fine against the owner of the radiation machine or, if a lessee of the radiation machine has effective control of the radiation machine, the lessee, of not more than $500.00 for each calendar week in which a mammography is performed in violation of subsection (1). If a person continues to violate subsection (1) for a period of 2 weeks after a fine is imposed under this subsection, the department shall post a conspicuous notice on the radiation machine and at the entry to the facility where the radiation machine is located warning the public that the facility is performing mammography using a radiation machine that is a substantial hazard to the public health. (4) The department shall promulgate rules necessary to implement this section. In promulgating rules to implement this section, the department shall comply with both of the following: (a) The department shall incorporate by reference what the department determines to be the applicable standards for mammography, including, but not limited to, standards under the mammography quality standards act of 1992, Public Law 102-539, and any regulations promulgated under that act, that exist on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this sentence. If a standard described in this subdivision is revised after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this sentence, the department shall take notice of the revision and the department shall promulgate rules to incorporate the revision by reference. (b) The rules must specify the minimum training and performance standards for an individual using a radiation machine for mammography. Enacting section 1. Sections 13524 and 13531 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.13524 and 333.13531, are repealed. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor